Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2020 special session Act is added to and  made a part of ORS
181A.355 to 181A.670.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “misconduct” means:
(a) Unjustified or excessive force that is  objectively unreasonable under the circum-
stances or in violation of the use of force policy for the law  enforcement unit employing the
offending officer;
(b) Sexual harassment or sexual misconduct;
Enrolled House Bill 4205 (HB 4205-A) Page 1
(c) Discrimination against a person based on race, color, religion,  sex, sexual orientation,
national origin, disability or age;
(d) A crime; or
(e) A violation of  the minimum standards for physical, emotional, intellectual and moral
fitness for public safety personnel established under ORS 181A.410.
(2) Without regard to rank or  assignment, a police officer or reserve officer shall inter-
vene to prevent or stop another police officer or reserve  officer engaged in any act the in-
tervening officer knows or reasonably  should know is misconduct, unless the intervening
officer cannot intervene safely.
(3) A police officer or reserve  officer who witnesses another police officer or reserve of-
ficer engaging in misconduct shall report the misconduct to a supervisor as soon as practi-
cable, but no later than 72 hours after witnessing the misconduct.
(4) Failure to intervene or report as required by subsections (2) and (3)  of this section is
grounds for  disciplinary action against a police officer or reserve officer by the law enforce-
ment unit employing the officer or for the Department of Public Safety  Standards and
Training to suspend or revoke the  officer’s certification as provided in ORS 181A.630,
181A.640 and 181A.650.
(5) An employer may  not discharge, demote, suspend or in any manner discriminate or
retaliate against a police officer or reserve officer with  regard to promotion, compensation
or other terms, conditions or privileges of employment for the reason that  the officer in-
tervened or reported as required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section. Violation of  this
subsection is an unlawful employment practice as provided in ORS 659A.199.
(6) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training shall report at least annually
to an appropriate committee of the Legislative  Assembly on any rules adopted by the de-
partment implementing this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2020 special session Act being necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health  and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2020 special
session Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by House June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4205 (HB 4205-A) Page 2